North Dakota, session 69, HB1564.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 27-19.1-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
27-19.1-01. Active efforts and procedures - Definitions.
1. As used in this chapter, unless context requires otherwise:
a. "Active efforts" means affirmative, active, thorough, and timely efforts intended primarily
to maintain or reunite an Indian child with the Indian child's family. If an agency is
involved in the child custody proceeding, active efforts must involve assisting the parent
or a parent or Indian custodian with the steps of a case plan and including accessing or
developing the resources necessary to satisfy the case plan. To the maximum extent
possible, active efforts should be provided in a manner consistent with the prevailing
social and cultural conditions and way of life of the Indian child's tribe and should be
conducted in partnership with the Indian child and the Indian child's parents, extended
family members, Indian custodians, and tribe. Active efforts are to be tailored to the facts
and circumstances of the case. The term includes:
(1) Conducting a comprehensive assessment of the circumstances of the Indian child's
family, with a focus on safe reunification as the most desirable goal, with ongoing
timely assessment to determine when the threat is resolved and placement of the
Indian child can be returned to the custodian.
(2) Identifying appropriate services and helping a parent or Indian custodian to
overcome barriers, including actively assisting a parent or Indian custodian in
obtaining such services.
(3) Identifying, notifying, and inviting representatives of the Indian child's tribe to
participate in providing support and services to the Indian child's family and in family
team meetings, permanency planning, and resolution of placement issues.
(4) Conducting or causing to be conducted a diligent search for the Indian child's
extended family members, and contacting and consulting with extended family
members to provide family structure and support for the Indian child and the Indian
child's parent or Indian custodian.
(5) Offering and employing available and culturally appropriate family preservation
strategies and facilitating the use of remedial and rehabilitative services provided by
the Indian child's tribe.
(6) Taking steps to keep siblings together, if possible.

H. B. NO. 1564 - PAGE 2
(7) Supporting regular visits with a parent or Indian custodian in the most natural setting
possible as well as trial home visits of the Indian child during any period of removal,
consistent with the need to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the Indian child.
(8) Identifying community resources, including housing, financial, transportation, mental
health, substance abuse, and peer support services and actively assisting the
Indian child's parent or Indian custodian or, as appropriate, the Indian child's family,
in utilizing and accessing those resources.
(9) Monitoring progress and participation in services.
(10) Considering alternative ways to address the needs of the Indian child's parent or
Indian custodian and where appropriate, the family, if the optimum services do not
exist or are not available.
(11) Providing post-reunification services and monitoring.
b. "Adoptive placement" means the permanent placement of an Indian child for adoption.
c. "Extended family member" means a relationship defined by the law or custom of the
Indian child's tribe or, in the absence of such law or custom, means an individual who has
reached the age of eighteen and who is the Indian child's grandparent, aunt or uncle,
brother or sister, brother-in-law or sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or second cousin,
or stepparent.
d. "Foster care or nonfoster care placement" means the removal of an Indian child from the
home of his or her parent or Indian custodian for temporary placement in a foster home,
qualified residential treatment program, residential care center for Indian children and
youth, or certified shelter care facility, in the home of a relative other than a parent or
Indian custodian, or in the home of a guardian, from which placement the parent or
Indian custodian cannot have the Indian child returned upon demand. The term does not
include an adoptive placement, a preadoptive placement, andan emergency change in
placement under section 27-20.3-06, or holding an Indian child in custodya placement
pursuant to a criminal or delinquency proceeding.
e. "Indian" means an individual who is a member of an Indian tribe, or who is a native and a
member of a regional corporation as defined under 43 U.S.C. 1606.
f. "Indian child" means any unmarried individual who is under the age of eighteen and is
either a member of an Indian tribe or is eligible for membership in an Indian tribe and is
the biological child of a member of an Indian tribe.
g. "Indian child custody proceeding" means a proceeding brought by the state involving:
(1) Foster care or nonfoster care placement;
(2) A preadoptive placement;
(3) An adoptive placement; or
(4) A termination of parental rights under section 27-20.3-20 for an Indian child.
h. "Indian child's tribe" means the Indian tribe in which an Indian child is a member or
eligible for membership or, in the case of an Indian child who is a member of or eligible
for membership in more than one tribe, the Indian tribe with which the Indian child has
the more significant contacts.

H. B. NO. 1564 - PAGE 3
i. "Indian custodian" means any Indian individual who has legal custody of an Indian child
under tribal law or custom or under state law or to whom temporary physical care,
custody, and control has been transferred by the parent of the Indian child.
j. "Indian tribe" means an Indian tribe, band, nation, or other organized Indian group or
community of Indians recognized as eligible for services provided to Indians by the
United States secretary of the interior because of their status as Indians, including any
Alaska native village as defined in 43 U.S.C. 1602(c).
k. "Parent" means a biological parent or parents of an Indian child or an Indian individual
who has lawfully adopted an Indian child, including adoptions under tribal law or custom.
The term does not include the unwed father if paternity has not been acknowledged or
established.
l. "Preadoptive placement" means the temporary placement of an Indian child in a foster
home, home of a relative other than a parent or Indian custodian, or home of a guardian
after a termination of parental rights but before or in lieu of an adoptive placement, but
does not include an emergency change in placement under section 27-20.3-06.
m. "Termination of parental rights" means any action resulting in the termination of the
parent-child relationship. It does not include a placement based upon an act by an Indian
child which, if committed by an adult, would be deemed a crime or a placement upon
award of custody to one of the Indian child's parents in a divorce proceeding.
2. Before removal of an Indian child from the custody of a parent or Indian custodian for
purposes of involuntary foster care placement or the termination of parental rights over an
Indian child, the court shall find that active efforts have been made to provide remedial
services and rehabilitative services designed to prevent the breakup of the Indian family and
that these efforts have proved unsuccessful. The court may not order the removal unless
evidence of active efforts shows there has been a vigorous and concerted level of casework
beyond the level that would constitute reasonable efforts under section 27-20.3-26.
Reasonable efforts may not be construed to be active efforts. Active efforts must be made in a
manner that takes into account the prevailing social and cultural values, conditions, and way
of life of the Indian child's tribe. Active efforts must utilize the available resources of the Indian
child's extended family, tribe, tribal and other relevant social service agencies, and individual
Indian caregivers.
3. The court may order the removal of the Indian child for involuntary foster care placement only
if the court determines, by clear and convincing evidence, that continued custody of the Indian
child by the parent or Indian custodian is likely to result in serious emotional or physical
damage to the Indian child. Evidence must show a causal relationship between the particular
conditions in the home and the likelihood that continued custody of the Indian child will result
in serious emotional or physical damage to the particular Indian child who is the subject of the
proceeding. Poverty, isolation, custodian age, crowded or inadequate housing, substance use,
or nonconforming social behavior does not by itself constitute clear and convincing evidence
of imminent serious emotional or physical damage to the Indian child. As soon as the threat
has been removed and the Indian child is no longer at risk, the state should terminate the
removal, by returning the Indian child to the parent or Indian custodian while offering a solution
to mitigate the situation that gave rise to the need for emergency removal and placement.
4. The court may order the termination of parental rights over the Indian child only if the court
determines, by evidence beyond a reasonable doubt that continued custody of the Indian child
by the parent or Indian custodian is likely to result in serious emotional or physical damage to
the Indian child.
5. In considering whether to involuntarily place an Indian child in foster care or to terminate the
parental rights of the parent of an Indian child, the court shall require that a qualified expert

H. B. NO. 1564 - PAGE 4
witness must be qualified to testify regarding whether the Indian child's continued custody by
the parent or Indian custodian is likely to result in serious emotional or physical damage to the
Indian child and should be qualified to testify as to the prevailing social and cultural standards
of the Indian child's tribe. An individual may be designated by the Indian child's tribe as being
qualified to testify to the prevailing social and cultural standards of the Indian child's tribe. If
the parties stipulate in writing and the court is satisfied the stipulation is made knowingly,
intelligently, and voluntarily, the court may accept a declaration or affidavit from a qualified
expert witness in lieu of testimony. If one or more parties have been found to be in default
under the North Dakota Rules of Juvenile Procedure, the court may accept a declaration or
affidavit from a qualified expert witness without a stipulation in writing from the defaulted
parties. The court or any party may request the assistance of the Indian child's tribe or the
bureau of Indian affairs office serving the Indian child's tribe in locating individuals qualified to
serve as expert witnesses. The social worker regularly assigned to the Indian child may not
serve as a qualified expert witness in child custody proceedings concerning the Indian child.
The qualified expert witness should be someone familiar with the particular Indian child and
have contact with the parent or Indian custodian to observe interaction between the parent or
Indian custodian, Indian child, and extended family members. The child welfare agency and
courts should facilitate access to the family and records to facilitate accurate testimony.
6. If a court order authorizes the emergency removal of the Indian child from the parent or Indian
custodian of the child under state law, the order must be accompanied by a declaration from
the child welfare agency that includes:
a. The name, tribal affiliation, and address of the Indian child, each parent of the Indian
child, and the Indian custodian of the child, as applicable; and
b. A detailed account of the circumstances that led the agency responsible for emergency
removal of the child to take action.
7. An emergency removal or placement of an Indian child under state law must terminate
immediately when the removal or placement is no longer necessary to prevent imminent
physical damage or harm to the Indian child. If removal or placement is determined to be no
longer necessary, the child welfare agency shall terminate the removal by returning the Indian
child to the parent or Indian custodian and offer a solution to mitigate the situation that gave
rise to the need for emergency removal and placement.
7.8. If an Indian child is the subject of a shelter care hearing, the party initiating the hearing shall
provide the court with a declaration that includes the specific actions that have been taken to
assist the parent or Indian custodian since the emergency removal so the child may be safely
returned to the custody of the parent or Indian custodian, and the specific actions the initiating
party intends to take so the Indian child may be returned safely without initiating an Indian
child custody proceeding.
9. To facilitate the intent of this chapter, the agency, in cooperation with the Indian child's tribe of
affiliation, unless a parent objects, shall take steps to enroll the Indian child in the tribe with the
goal of finalizing enrollment before termination.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 27-19.1-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
27-19.1-02. Jurisdiction over custody proceedings.
1. This chapter includes requirements that apply if an Indian child is the subject of:
a. A child custody proceeding, including:
(1) An involuntary proceeding; and

H. B. NO. 1564 - PAGE 5
(2) A voluntary proceeding that could prohibit the parent or Indian custodian from
regaining custody of the Indian child upon demand; and
(3) A proceeding involving status offenses if any part of the proceeding results in the
need for out-of-home placement of the child, including a foster care, preadoptive or
adoptive placement, or termination of parental rights.
b. An emergency proceeding other than:
(1) A tribal.
2. This chapter does not apply to:
a. A tribal court proceeding; or
(2)b. A proceeding regarding a delinquent act;
c. An award of custody of the Indian child to one of the parents, including an award in a
divorce proceeding; or
d. A voluntary placement that either parent, both parents, or the Indian custodian has, of his
or her or their free will, without a threat of removal by a state agency, chosen for the
Indian child and that does not operate to prohibit the Indian child's parent or Indian
custodian from regaining custody of the Indian child upon demand.
2.3. If a proceeding under subsection 1 concerns an Indian child, this chapter applies to that
proceeding. In determining whether this chapter applies to a proceeding, the state court may
not consider factors such as the participation of a parent or the Indian child in tribal cultural,
social, religious, or political activities; the relationship between the Indian child and the Indian
child's parent; whether the parent ever had custody of the Indian child; or the Indian child's
blood quantum.
3.4. If this chapter applies at the commencement of a proceeding, this chapter does not cease to
apply solely because the Indian child reaches age eighteen during the pendency of the
proceeding.
4.5. In an Indian child custody proceeding under this chapter involving an Indian child who is not
residing or domiciled within the reservation of the Indian child's tribe, the court assigned to
exercise jurisdiction under this chapter, upon the petition of the Indian child's parent, Indian
custodian, or tribe, shall transfer the proceeding to the jurisdiction of the tribe unless either of
the following applies:
a. A parent of the Indian child objects to the transfer.
b. An Indian tribe has exclusive jurisdiction over an Indian child custody proceeding
involving an Indian child who resides or is domiciled within the reservation of the tribe,
except if that jurisdiction is otherwise vested in the state by federal law. If an Indian child
is a ward of a tribal court, the Indian tribe retains exclusive jurisdiction regardless of the
residence or domicile of the Indian child.
5.6. In an Indian child custody proceeding under this chapter involving an Indian child who is not
residing or domiciled within the reservation of the Indian child's tribe, the court assigned to
exercise jurisdiction under this chapter, upon the petition of the Indian child's parent, Indian
custodian, or tribe, shall transfer the proceeding to the jurisdiction of the tribe unless any of the
following apply:
a. A parent of the Indian child objects to the transfer.

H. B. NO. 1564 - PAGE 6
b. The Indian child's tribe does not have a tribal court, or the tribal court of the Indian child's
tribe declines jurisdiction.
c. The court determines good cause exists to deny the transfer. In determining whether
good cause exists to deny the transfer, the court may not consider any perceived
inadequacy of the tribal social services department or the tribal court of the Indian child's
tribe. The court may determine good cause exists to deny the transfer only if the person
opposing the transfer shows by clear and convincing evidence the evidence or testimony
necessary to decide the case cannot be presented in tribal court without undue hardship
to the parties or the witnesses and that the tribal court is unable to mitigate the hardship
by making arrangements to receive the evidence or testimony by use of telephone or live
audiovisual means, by hearing the evidence or testimony at a location that is convenient
to the parties and witnesses, or by use of other means permissible under the tribal court's
rules of evidence.
6.7. An Indian child's tribe may intervene at any point in an Indian child custody proceeding.
7.8. The state shall give full faith and credit to the public acts, records, and judicial proceedings of
an Indian tribe which are applicable to an Indian child custody proceeding to the same extent
that the state gives full faith and credit to the public acts, records, and judicial proceedings of
any other governmental entity.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 27-19.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. In a proceeding involving the foster care or nonfoster care placement of or termination of
parental rights to an Indian child whom the court knows or has reason to know may be an
Indian child, the party seeking the foster care or nonfoster care placement or termination of
parental rights, for the first hearing of the proceeding, shall notify the Indian child's parent,
Indian custodian, and tribe, by registered mail, return receipt requested, of the pending
proceeding and of the parties' right to intervene in the proceeding and shall file the return
receipt with the court. Notice of subsequent hearings in a proceeding must be in writing and
may be given by mail, personal delivery, facsimile transmission, or electronic mail. If the
identity or location of the Indian child's parent, Indian custodian, or tribe cannot be determined,
that notice shall be given to the United States secretary of the interior in like manner. The first
hearing in the proceeding may not be held until at least ten days after receipt of the notice by
the parent, Indian custodian, and tribe or until at least fifteen days after receipt of the notice by
the United States secretary of the interior. On request of the parent, Indian custodian, or tribe,
the court shall grant a continuance of up to twenty additional days to enable the requester to
prepare for that hearing.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 27-19.1-04 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. A voluntary consent by a parent or Indian custodian to a foster care or nonfoster care
placement of an Indian child is not valid unless the consent or delegation is executed in
writing, recorded before a judge, and accompanied by a written certification by the judge that
the terms and consequences of the consent or delegation were fully explained in detail to and
were fully understood by the parent or Indian custodian. The judge also shall certify the parent
or Indian custodian fully understood the explanation in English or that the explanation was
interpreted into a language the parent or Indian custodian understood. Any consent or
delegation of powers given under this subsection before or within ten days after the birth of the
Indian child is not valid. A parent or Indian custodian who has executed a consent or
delegation of powers under this subsection may withdraw the consent or delegation for any
reason at any time, and the Indian child must be returned to the parent or Indian custodian. A
parent or Indian custodian who has executed a consent or delegation of powers under this
subsection also may move to invalidate the out-of-home care placement.

H. B. NO. 1564 - PAGE 7
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 27-19.1-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
27-19.1-05. PlacementsPlacement preferences.
1. Subject to subsections 3 and 4, in placing an Indian child for adoption or in delegating powers,
as described in a lawful executed power of attorney regarding an Indian child, preference must
be given, in the absence of good cause, as described in subsection 6, to the contrary, to a
placement with or delegation to one of the following, in the order of preference listed:
a. The tribe's statutory adopted placement preference, if applicable;
b. An extended family member of the Indian child;
b.c. Another member of the Indian child's tribe;
c.d. Another Indian family with whom the Indian child has a relationship or an Indian family
from a tribe that is culturally similar to or linguistically connected to the Indian child's tribe;
or
d.e. The tribe's statutory adopted placement preferencesAnother Indian family.
2. An Indian child who is accepted for a foster care or nonfoster care placement or a preadoptive
placement must be placed in the least restrictive setting that most approximates a family that
meets the Indian child's special needs, if any, and which is within reasonable proximity to the
Indian child's home, taking into account those special needs. Subject to subsections 4 and 6,
in placing an Indian child in a foster care or nonfoster care placement or a preadoptive
placement, preference must be given, in the absence of good cause, as described in
subsection 6, to the contrary, to a placement in one of the following, in the order of preference
listed:
a. The tribe's statutory adopted placement preference, if applicable;
b. The home of an extended family member of the Indian child;
b.c. A foster home licensed, approved, or specified by the Indian child's tribe;
c.d. An Indian foster home licensed or approved by the department; or
d.e. A qualified residential treatment facility or residential care center for children and youth
approved by an Indian tribe or operated by an Indian organization that has a program
suitable to meet the needs of the Indian child.
3. An Indian child who is the subject of an emergency removal or placement under a child
custody determination under section 27-20.3-06 must be placed in compliance with foster care
or nonfoster care placement or preadoptive placement preferences, unless the person
responsible for determining the placement finds good cause, as described in subsection 6, for
departing from the order of placement preference under subsection 2 or finds that emergency
conditions necessitate departing from that order. When the reason for departing from that
order is resolved, the Indian child must be placed in compliance with the order of placement
preference under subsection 2.
4. In placing an Indian child under subsections 1 and 2 regarding an Indian child under
subsection 1, if the Indian child's tribe has established, by resolution, an order of preference
that is different from the order specified in subsection 1 or 2, the order of preference
established by that tribe must be followed, in the absence of good cause, as described in
subsection 6, to the contrary, so long as the placement under subsection 1 is appropriate for
the Indian child's special needs, if any, and the placement under subsection 2 is the least
restrictive setting appropriate for the Indian child's needs as specified in subsection 2.

H. B. NO. 1564 - PAGE 8
5. The standards to be applied in meeting the placement preference requirements of this
subsection must be the prevailing social and cultural standards of the Indian community in
which the Indian child's parent, Indian custodian, or extended family members reside or with
which the Indian child's parent, Indian custodian, or extended family members maintain social
and cultural ties.
6. a. If a party asserts that good cause not to follow the placement preferences exists, the
reasons for that belief or assertion must be stated orally on the record or provided in
writing to the parties to the child custody proceeding and the court.
b. The party seeking departure from the placement preferences bears the burden of proving
by clear and convincing evidence that there is good cause to depart from the placement
preferences.
c. A court's determination of good cause to depart from the placement preferences must be
made on the record or in writing and must be based on one or more of the following
considerations:
(1) The request of the Indian child's parent, if they attest that they have reviewed the
placement options, if any, that comply with the order of preference.
(2) The request of the Indian child, if the Indian child is of sufficient age and capacity to
understand the decision being made.
(3) The presence of a sibling attachment that can be maintained only through a
particular placement.
(4) The extraordinary physical, mental, or emotional needs of the Indian child, such as
specialized treatment services that may be unavailable in the community where
families who meet the placement preferences live.
(5) The unavailability of a suitable placement after a determination by the court that a
diligent search was conducted to find suitable placements meeting the preference
criteria, but none has been located. For purposes of this analysis, the standards for
determining whether a placement is unavailable must conform to the prevailing
social and cultural standards of the Indian community in which the Indian child's
parent, Indian custodian, or extended family resides or with which the Indian child's
parent, Indian custodian, or extended family members maintain social and cultural
ties.
d. A placement may not depart from the preferences based on the socioeconomic status of
any placement relative to another placement.
e. A placement may not depart from the preferences based solely on ordinary bonding or
attachment that flowed from time spent in a nonpreferred placement that was made in
violation of this chapter.
f. The burden of establishing good cause to depart from the order of placement preference
is on the party requesting that departure.
7. The department or a child welfare agency shall maintain a record of each adoptive placement,
foster care or nonfoster care placement, preadoptive placement, and delegation of powers,
made of an Indian child, evidencing the efforts made to comply with the placement preference
requirements specified in this section, and shall make that record available at any time on the
request of the United States secretary of the interior or the Indian child's tribe.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 27-19.1-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:

H. B. NO. 1564 - PAGE 9
27-19.1-06. Adoptee information.
1. The state court entering a final adoption decree or order in any voluntary or involuntary Indian
child adoptive placement must furnish a copy of the decree or order within thirty days to the
Bureau of Indian Affairs, Chief, Division of Human Services, 1849 C Street NW, Mail Stop
3645 MIB, Washington, DC 20240as prescribed by the Bureau of Indian Affairs, along with the
following information, in an envelope marked "Confidential":
a. The birth name and birth date of the Indian child, and tribal affiliation and name of the
Indian child after adoption;
b. The names and addresses of the biological parents;
c. The names and addresses of the adoptive parents;
d. The name and contact information for any agency having files or information relating to
the adoption;
e. Any affidavit signed by the biological parent or parents requesting the parent's identity
remain confidential; and
f. Any information relating to tribal membership or eligibility for tribal membership of the
adopted Indian child.
2. The court shall give the birth parent of an Indian child the opportunity to file an affidavit
indicating that the birth parent wishes the United States secretary of the interior to maintain
the confidentiality of the birth parent's identity. If the birth parent files that affidavit, the court
shall include the affidavit with the information provided to the United States secretary of the
interior under subsection 1, and that secretary shall maintain the confidentiality of the birth
parent's identity.

H. B. NO. 1564 - PAGE 10
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1564.
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State